West Virginia, session 2025, HB2137.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 3. original and Renewal of Registration; Issuance of Certificates of Title. §17A-3-14. Registration plates generally; description of plates; issuance of special numbers and plates; registration fees; special application fees; exemptions; commissioner to promulgate forms; suspension and nonrenewal. suspension of registration; electronic signatures. (a) The division, upon registering a vehicle, shall issue to the owner one registration plate with a registration number consisting of a combination of letters, numerals, symbols, or characters in a configuration determined by the commissioner. (b) Registration plates shall meet the following requirements:(1) Plates must incorporate reflectorized material.(2) Registration numbers shall be plainly readable from 100 feet during daylight.(3) The commissioner may assign any additional feature to facilitate reciprocal agreements, facilitate interstate travel, promote highway safety, or promote the efficient operation of the division.(4) The commissioner may issue special registration plates for 100% disabled veterans as follows:(A) Upon appropriate application, the division may issue a special registration plate designed by the commissioner for any number of vehicles titled in the name of the qualified applicant. (B) The division shall charge a special initial application fee of $10 in addition to all other fees required by law. This special fee shall be collected by the division and deposited in the State Road Fund. (C) The division shall charge an annual fee of $15 for each special registration plate in addition to all other fees required by this chapter. (D) There will be no minimum number of applications required prior to design and production of a special license plate for 100% disabled veterans.(c) The commissioner may suspend the registration of any owner who displays a damaged or illegible plate or otherwise fails to comply with the requirements of §17A-3-19 of this code.   (d) Any license plate issued or renewed pursuant to this chapter which is paid for by a check that is returned for nonsufficient funds is void without further notice to the applicant. The applicant may not reinstate the registration until the returned check is paid by the applicant in cash, money order, or certified check and all applicable fees assessed as a result thereof have been paid.(e) In furtherance of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, §39A-1-1 et seq. of this code, the division may accept or authorize an electronic signature in any instance the law required to be enforced by the commissioner requires a signature or a pen and ink signature.